Hawaii statutes.
§431:20-122 Annual statement. Every
title insurer shall include in its annual statement furnished to the
commissioner pursuant to section 431:20-103(4), the name of each person in this
State which is a controlled escrow company or underwritten title company by
reason of its relationship with such title insurer. [L 1987, c 347, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next